Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.040

Service of notice of claim—Fee.

The notice of claim may be served either as provided for the service of summons or complaint and notice in civil actions as described in RCW 4.28.080 or by registered or certified mail if a return receipt with the signature of the party being served is filed with the court. No other legal document or process is to be served with the notice of claim. Information from the court regarding the small claims department, local small claims procedure, dispute resolution services, or other matters related to litigation in the small claims department may be included with the notice of claim when served.

The notice of claim shall be served promptly after filing the claim. Service must be complete at least ten calendar days prior to the first hearing.

The person serving the notice of claim shall be entitled to receive from the plaintiff, besides mileage, the fee specified in RCW 36.18.040 for such service; which sum, together with the filing fee set forth in RCW 12.40.020, shall be added to any judgment given for plaintiff.

[ 2019 c 251 s 3; 1997 c 352 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 61; 1981 c 194 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 83 s 3; 1959 c 263 s 9; 1919 c 187 s 4; RRS s 1777-4.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1981 c 194: See note following RCW 36.18.040.